South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4610.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "South Carolina State American Sign Language Symbol Act." SECTION 2.  The General Assembly finds: (1) The "I Love You" (ILY) hand gesture, widely recognized in American Sign Language (ASL), symbolizes love, unity, and inclusivity across diverse communities, including individuals who are deaf, hard of hearing, and those advocating for accessible communication. (2) South Carolina has a rich history of supporting accessibility and inclusion for individuals with disabilities, as seen through the work of educators, advocates, and organizations such as the South Carolina School for the Deaf and the Blind (SCSDB). (3) The ILY hand gesture holds cultural and historical significance beyond ASL, representing universal goodwill and human connection. Its formal designation as a state symbol aligns with South Carolina's values of community, education, and heritage. (4) Sculptor Bob Doster, in collaboration with South Carolina students-including those from the SCSDB-has created public sculptures of the ILY gesture in Spartanburg and Columbia, highlighting its importance as a visual and educational representation of ASL. (5) Recognizing the ILY hand gesture as an official state emblem will: (a) promote awareness and education about ASL; (b) encourage inclusivity in state programs, schools, and public spaces; and (c) honor South Carolina's commitment to accessibility and communication equity. SECTION 3.  Article 9, Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-1-687. (A) The "I Love You" (ILY) hand gesture is hereby designated as the official American Sign Language symbol of the State of South Carolina. (B) The official description of the ILY hand gesture must be defined as follows: The thumb, index finger, and pinky are extended, while the middle and ring fingers remain folded down. This gesture is widely recognized in ASL and is used globally to express "I Love You." (C) This symbol must be recognized in all official contexts related to South Carolina state emblems and may be incorporated into state branding, educational curriculum, and public awareness campaigns. SECTION 4.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 29 American Sign Language Symbol Section 1-1-1810.  (A) The South Carolina Department of Education shall: (1) incorporate the "I Love You" (ILY) gesture into the state's educational curriculum, particularly in social studies, language development, and accessibility training; (2) develop instructional materials to teach the significance of American Sign Language (ASL) and the ILY gesture in public schools and universities; and (3) work with state agencies and disability advocates to promote ASL awareness through public events, historical exhibits, and community programs. (B) The South Carolina Arts Commission and the State Historic Preservation Office shall: (1) recognize existing sculptures of the ILY hand gesture, such as those created by Bob Doster, as part of South Carolina's public art and cultural heritage; and (2) encourage new public art installations incorporating the ILY gesture to promote accessibility awareness. (C) The Governor's Office and relevant agencies shall: (1) establish an annual recognition event celebrating ASL and the ILY gesture, with participation from schools, legislators, and disability advocacy groups; (2) ensure state agencies and offices have ASL-accessible resources and promote the use of the ILY gesture as a symbol of inclusivity; and (3) collaborate with South Carolina-based businesses, tourism boards, and historical organizations to integrate the ILY gesture into public signage, promotional materials, and state heritage programs. (D) The South Carolina Department of Transportation (SCDOT) shall: (1) consider adding educational signage at major landmarks, welcome centers, and highways to recognize the ILY gesture as a South Carolina state symbol; and (2) work with the Department of Education and advocacy groups to create awareness campaigns highlighting the ILY gesture's meaning and significance. (E) The General Assembly encourages: (1) local governments, businesses, and educational institutions to recognize and promote the ILY gesture in their communities; (2) partnerships with advocacy organizations, including disability rights groups and ASL educators, to expand awareness and support for the ILY symbol; and (3) further initiatives that advance accessibility and communication equity in South Carolina. SECTION 5.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor and must be fully implemented by July 1, 2027. ----XX----